New York, session 2025-2026, S10665.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Social 2 Worker Initiative for Faster Testing (SWIFT) act". 3 § 2. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 1 of section 7704 of the education 4 law, as added by chapter 420 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 (d) Examination: pass an examination satisfactory to the board and in 7 accordance with the commissioner's regulations. Notwithstanding the 8 foregoing, an applicant pursuing a master's of social work degree who is 9 enrolled in the final semester of a program registered by the department 10 or an educational program accredited or in candidacy for accreditation 11 by the council on social work education shall be eligible to take the 12 master's level examination; provided, however, that passage of such 13 examination shall not authorize the applicant to practice social work or 14 entitle the applicant to licensure until all other requirements for 15 licensure under this article, including graduation from such program, 16 have been fulfilled; 17 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 18 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 19 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 20 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 21 date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15318-04-6